Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 11

Adult-Oriented Establishment Registration Act of 1998

7-51-1101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult-Oriented Establishment Registration Act of 1998.”

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 1; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Part contingent upon local referendum. See §7-51-1120.

Cross-References. Adult-oriented establishments, title 7, ch. 51, part 14.

Massage registration, title 63, ch. 18.

Sale, loan or exhibition of material to minors, §39-17-911.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 87-70, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (4/15/87).

7-51-1102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult bookstore” means a business that offers, as its principal or predominate stock or trade, sexually oriented material, devices, or paraphernalia, whether determined by the total number of sexually oriented materials, devices or paraphernalia offered for sale or by the retail value of such materials, devices or paraphernalia, specified sexual activities, or any combination or form thereof, whether printed, filmed, recorded or live, and that restricts or purports to restrict admission to adults or to any class of adults. The definition specifically includes items sexually oriented in nature, regardless of how labeled or sold, such as adult novelties, risqué gifts or marital aids;

“Adult cabaret” means an establishment that features as a principal use of its business, entertainers, waiters, or bartenders who expose to public view of the patrons within such establishment, at any time, the bare female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola, human genitals, pubic region, or buttocks, even if partially covered by opaque material or completely covered by translucent material, including swim suits, lingerie, or latex covering. “Adult cabaret” includes a commercial establishment that features entertainment of an erotic nature, including exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators, or similar entertainers;

“Adult entertainment” means any exhibition of any adult-oriented motion picture, live performance, display or dance of any type, that has as a principal or predominant theme, emphasis, or portion of such performance, any actual or simulated performance of specified sexual activities or exhibition and viewing of specified anatomical areas, removal of articles of clothing or appearing unclothed, pantomime, modeling, or any other personal service offered customers;

“Adult mini-motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity of fewer than fifty (50) persons regularly used for presenting material distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this section, for observation by patrons in the building;

“Adult motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity of fifty (50) or more persons regularly used for presenting material having as a dominant theme or presenting material distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this section, for observation by patrons in the building;

“Adult-oriented establishment” includes, but is not limited to, an adult bookstore, adult motion picture theater, adult mini-motion picture establishment, adult cabaret, escort agency, sexual encounter center, massage parlor, rap parlor, sauna; further, “adult-oriented establishment” means any premises to which the public patrons or members are invited or admitted and that are so physically arranged as to provide booths, cubicles, rooms, compartments or stalls separate from the common areas of the premises for the purpose of viewing adult-oriented motion pictures, or wherein an entertainer provides adult entertainment to a member of the public, a patron or a member, when such adult entertainment is held, conducted, operated or maintained for a profit, direct or indirect. “Adult-oriented establishment” further includes, without being limited to, any adult entertainment studio or any premises that is physically arranged and used as such, whether advertised or represented as an adult entertainment studio, rap studio, exotic dance studio, encounter studio, sensitivity studio, model studio, escort service, escort or any other term of like import;

“Board” means the adult-oriented establishment board, or, if there is in existence in the county a massage registration board appointed by the county mayor, such board may be substituted for the board;

“County,” as used in this part, means either a Class A county or a Class B county as classified in § 57-5-103(b). When county legislative body or county mayor is used in this part, it means metropolitan council or metropolitan mayor when applicable to a Class B county;

“Employee” means a person who performs any service on the premises of an adult-oriented establishment on a full-time, part-time, or contract basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent contractor, agent or otherwise, and whether or not such person is paid a salary, wage, or other compensation by the operator of such business;

“Employee” does not include a person exclusively on the premises for repair or maintenance of the premises or equipment on the premises, or for the delivery of goods to the premises, nor does it include an independent accountant, attorney, or other similar professional incidentally visiting the premises solely to perform accounting, legal or other similar professional services; provided, that the accountant, attorney or other similar professional is not a manager, owner, operator, entertainer, or escort connected with the adult-oriented establishment or the providing of adult entertainment;

“Entertainer” means any person who provides entertainment within an “adult-oriented establishment” as defined in this section, whether or not a fee is charged or accepted for entertainment and whether or not entertainment is provided as an employee, escort or an independent contractor;

“Escort” means a person who, for monetary consideration in the form of a fee, commission, salary or tip, dates, socializes, visits, consorts with, accompanies, or offers to date, socialize, visit, consort or accompany to social affairs, entertainment or places of amusement or within any place of public resort or within any private quarters of a place of public resort;

“Escort service” means a “person” as defined in this section, who, for a fee, commission, profit, payment or other monetary consideration, furnishes or offers to furnish escorts or provides or offers to introduce patrons to escorts;

“Massage parlor” means an establishment or place primarily in the business of providing massage or tanning services where one (1) or more of the employees exposes to public view of the patrons within such establishment, at any time, the bare female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola, human genitals, pubic region, or buttocks, even if partially covered by opaque material or completely covered by translucent material;

“Notice” means, when required by this part, placing the document in the United States mail with sufficient first-class postage to carry it to its destination to the address of the person being notified as contained in their application, unless such person has notified the board in writing of such person's new address. “Receipt of notification” is presumed three (3) days after the mailing of a notice as provided in this subdivision (14);

“Open office” means an office at the escort service from which the escort business is transacted and that is open to patrons or prospective patrons during all hours during which escorts are working, which is managed or operated by an employee, officer, director or owner of the escort service having authority to bind the service to escort and patron contracts and adjust patron and consumer complaints;

“Operator” means any person, partnership, or corporation operating, conducting or maintaining an adult-oriented establishment;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited partnership, firm, corporation or association;

“Rap parlor” means an establishment or place primarily in the business of providing nonprofessional conversation or similar service for adults;

“Sauna” means an establishment or place primarily in the business of providing:

A steam bath; or

Massage services;

“Service-oriented escort” is an escort that:

Operates from an open office;

Does not employ or use an escort runner;

Does not advertise that sexual conduct will be provided to the patron or work for an escort bureau that so advertises; and

Does not offer or provide sexual conduct;

“Service-oriented escort bureau” is an escort bureau that:

Maintains an open office at an established place of business;

Employs or provides only escorts who possess valid permits issued under this part;

Does not use an escort bureau runner; and

Does not advertise that sexual conduct will be provided to a patron;

“Sexual conduct” means the engaging in or the commission of an act of sexual intercourse, oral-genital contact, or the touching of the sexual organs, pubic region, buttocks or female breast of a person for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of another person;

“Sexual encounter center” means a business or commercial enterprise that, as one of its primary business purposes, offers for any form of consideration:

Physical contact in the form of wrestling or tumbling between persons of the opposite sex; or

Physical contact between male and female persons or persons of the same sex when one (1) or more of the persons exposes to view of the persons within such establishment, at any time, the bare female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola, human genitals, pubic region, or buttocks, even if partially covered by opaque material or completely covered by translucent material;

“Sexual gratification” means sexual conduct as defined in this section;

“Sexual stimulation” means to excite or arouse the prurient interest or to offer or solicit acts of sexual conduct as defined in this section;

“Sexually-oriented escort” is an escort that:

Employs as an employee, agent, or independent contractor an escort bureau runner;

Works for, as an agent, employee, contractor, or is referred to a patron by a sexually-oriented escort bureau;

Advertises that sexual conduct will be provided, or works for, as an employee, agent or independent contractor or is referred to a patron by an escort bureau that so advertises;

Solicits, offers to provide or does provide acts of sexual conduct to an escort patron, or accepts an offer or solicitation to provide acts of sexual conduct for a fee in addition to the fee charged by the escort bureau;

Works as an escort without having a current valid permit issued under this part in such person's possession at all times while working as an escort; or

Accepts a fee from a patron who has not first been delivered a contract;

“Sexually-oriented escort bureau” is an escort bureau that:

Does not maintain an open office;

Employs as an employee, agent, or independent contractor, uses an escort bureau runner;

Advertises that sexual conduct will be provided, or that escorts that provide such sexual conduct will be provided, referred, or introduced to a patron;

Solicits, offers to provide or does provide acts of sexual conduct to an escort patron;

Employs, contracts with or provides or refers escorts who do not possess valid permits issued under this part;

Does not deliver contracts to every patron or customer; or

Employs or contracts with a sexually-oriented escort, or refers or provides to a patron, a sexually-oriented escort;

“Specified anatomical areas” means:

Less than completely and opaquely covered:

Human genitals;

Pubic region;

Buttocks; and

Female breasts below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and

Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely opaquely covered;

“Specified criminal acts” means the following criminal offenses as defined by the Tennessee Code Annotated or the corresponding violation of another state or country:

Aggravated rape;

Rape;

Rape of a child;

Aggravated sexual battery;

Sexual battery by an authority figure;

Sexual battery;

Statutory rape;

Public indecency;

Prostitution;

Promoting prostitution;

Distribution of obscene materials;

Sale, loan or exhibition to a minor of material harmful to minors;

The display for sale or rental of material harmful to minors;

Sexual exploitation of a minor;

Aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor; and

Especially aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor;

“Specified services” means massage services, private dances, private modeling, acting as an escort as defined in this part, and any other live adult entertainment as defined in this section; and

“Specified sexual activities” means:

Human genitals in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal;

Acts of human masturbation, sexual intercourse or sodomy; or

Fondling or erotic touching of human genitals, pubic region, buttocks or female breasts.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 2; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2003, ch. 47, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 79, § 1; 2006, ch. 943, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1085, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Sale, loan or exhibition of material to minors, §39-17-911.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of disqualification provisions, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

“Adult-oriented establishment” construed, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

Proposed amendment clarifying the scope of the definition of “adult bookstore” in T.C.A. § 7-51- 1102(1) is constitutionally defensible, OAG 05-030 (3/29/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30.

7-51-1103. Adult-oriented establishment board — Massage registration board as substitute.

There is created in any county in which this part is adopted as provided in § 7-51-1120, an adult-oriented establishment board.

The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the county mayor of such counties. If there exists a massage registration board appointed by the county mayor, such board may be used for the adult-oriented establishments, as determined by the county mayor.

If the board consists of the massage registration board, the terms of the board members shall be coextensive with the terms of the massage registration board with no member serving after the expiration of the member's term or removal from the massage registration board. If the board consists of five (5) members appointed by such county mayor, the terms of the board members shall be for four (4) years.

A majority of the members to which the board is entitled shall constitute a quorum.

The board shall serve without compensation, but the members shall receive their actual expenses for attending adult-oriented establishment board meetings.

The board shall select a chair from among its members and the chair shall notify interested persons and members of board meetings.

The board shall meet as often as required to carry out this part.

To further the purposes of this part, the board shall have authority to promulgate procedural rules and any substantive rules consistent with this part that are constitutionally valid and are promulgated in such a way that the board's discretion about whether to grant, deny, revoke, or suspend a license or permit is not unbridled.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 3; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. Appointments to county adult-oriented establishment board. OAG 10-16, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/17/10).

7-51-1104. License to operate — Required.

Except as provided in subsection (e), from and after July 1, 1998, no adult-oriented establishment shall be operated or maintained in any applicable county without first obtaining a license to operate issued by the county adult-oriented establishment board.

A license may be issued only for one (1) adult-oriented establishment located at a fixed and certain place. Any person, partnership or corporation that desires to operate more than one (1) adult-oriented establishment must have a license for each. No building, premises, structure or other facility that contains any adult-oriented establishment shall contain any other kind of adult-oriented establishment.

No license or interest in a license may be transferred to any person, partnership or corporation.

It is unlawful for any entertainer, employee, escort or operator to knowingly work in or about or to knowingly perform any service directly related to or at the request of the operation of any unlicensed adult-oriented establishment or escort service.

All existing adult-oriented establishments, entertainers, employees, escorts, or operators, at the time this part is given local effect pursuant to § 7-51-1120, must submit an application for an appropriate license or permit within one hundred twenty (120) days of this part becoming effective in such county. All existing adult-oriented establishments, entertainers, employees, escorts, or operators, at the time this part is given local effect pursuant to § 7-51-1120, who timely submit an application for an appropriate license or permit, as set forth in this subsection (e), shall be granted a conditional license or permit maintaining the status quo, pending final judicial review by the trial court. If no timely application is filed within the one-hundred-twenty-day period, or no license or permit is issued by the board or granted through judicial review by the trial court, then the adult-oriented establishment, entertainer, employee, escort, or operator shall cease to operate or to perform such services or entertainment.

No license shall be issued by the board unless the applicant certifies, by proof satisfactory to the board, that the applicant has satisfied the rules, regulations and provisions of the applicable zoning requirements in the county. Any zoning requirement shall be in addition to and not an alternative to any requirement of this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 4; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 2; 2006, ch. 943, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of limitation on number of adult-oriented establishments in one location, OAG 90-02, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (1/8/90).

Prohibition of multiple adult-oriented establishments in the same building or structure. OAG 10-15, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (2/17/10).

7-51-1105. License to operate — Application.

Any person, partnership, or corporation desiring to secure a license shall make application to the adult-oriented establishment board. A copy of the application shall be distributed promptly to the county sheriff's department.

The application for a license shall be upon a form provided by the board. An applicant for a license shall furnish the following information under oath:

Name and address, including all aliases;

Written proof that the individual is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

The business, occupation or employment of the applicant in an adult- oriented establishment for five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application;

The adult-oriented establishment or similar business license history of the applicant; whether such applicant, in previously operating in this or any other county, city or state under license, has had such license revoked or suspended, the reason therefor, and the business activity or occupation subject to such action of suspension or revocation;

Any conviction for or plea of nolo contendere to a specified criminal act, as defined in § 7-51-1102;

The address of the adult-oriented establishment to be operated by the applicant;

If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall specify the name, address, and telephone number of the corporation, the date and the state of incorporation, the name and address of the registered agent for service of process of the corporation, and the names and addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation, and the names and addresses of any persons holding fifty percent (50%) or more of the stock of the corporation;

If the applicant is a partnership, the application shall specify the name and address of the partnership, and the name and address of all general partners of the partnership;

If the partnership is a limited partnership, the application shall specify the name and address of all general partners who have a controlling interest in the partnership; and

A statement by the applicant that the applicant is familiar with this part and is in compliance with this part.

Within ten (10) days of receiving the results of the investigation conducted by the board or the sheriff's department, pursuant to § 7-51-1106(4), the board shall notify the applicant that the application is granted, denied or held for further investigation. Such additional investigation shall not exceed an additional thirty (30) days unless otherwise agreed to by the applicant. Upon the conclusion of such additional investigation, the board shall advise the applicant in writing whether the application is granted or denied.

Failure or refusal of the applicant to give any information relevant to the investigation of the application, or the applicant's refusal or failure to appear at any reasonable time and place for examination under oath regarding the application or the applicant's refusal to submit to or cooperate with any investigation required by this part constitutes an admission by the applicant that the applicant is ineligible for such license and shall be grounds for denial of the license by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 5; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of disclosure requirements, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1106. License to operate — Qualifications.

To receive a license to operate an adult-oriented establishment, an applicant must meet the following standards:

If the applicant is an individual:

The applicant shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

The applicant shall not have had a license revoked within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application;

The applicant shall not have been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any violation of this part within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application; and

The applicant shall not have been convicted of a specified criminal act, as defined in § 7-51-1102, for which:

Less than two (2) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a misdemeanor offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a felony offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction for two (2) or more misdemeanor offenses occurring within any twelve-month period;

The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall have no effect on disqualification of the applicant;

(A) If the applicant is a corporation:

All officers, directors and stockholders required to be named under §7-51-1105(b) shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

No officer, director and stockholder required to be named under §7-51-1105(b) shall have had an adult-oriented establishment license revoked within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application;

No officer, director or stockholder required to be named under §7-51-1105(b) shall have been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any violation of this part within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application; and

The applicant or officer, director or stockholder required to be named under §7-51-1105(b) shall not have been convicted of a specified criminal act, as defined in §7-51-1102, for which:

Less than two (2) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a misdemeanor offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a felony offense; and

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction for two (2) or more misdemeanor offenses occurring within any twelve-month period;

The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall have no effect on disqualification of the applicant;

(A) If the applicant is a partnership, joint venture or any other type of organization where two (2) or more persons have a financial interest:

All persons having a financial interest in the partnership, joint venture or other type of organization shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

All persons having a financial interest in the partnership, joint venture or other type of organization shall not have had a license revoked within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application;

No applicant or person having a financial interest in the partnership, joint venture or other type of organization shall have been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any violation of this part within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application; and

The applicant or any person having a financial interest required to be disclosed shall not have been convicted of a specified criminal act, as defined in §7-51-1102, for which:

Less than two (2) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a misdemeanor offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a felony offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction for two (2) or more misdemeanor offenses occurring within any twelve-month period;

The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall have no effect on disqualification of the applicant;

No license shall be issued unless the board or sheriff's department has investigated the applicant's qualifications to be licensed. The results of that investigation shall be filed in writing with the board no later than twenty (20) days after the date of the application. The board shall only deny an application for a license for reasons set forth in this part;

An applicant who has been convicted of any “specified criminal activities” may not be denied a permit based on those convictions once the time period required in this section has elapsed.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 6; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of disqualification provisions, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1107. Inspections — Notice of results.

In order to effectuate this part, the board, its authorized representative or sheriff is empowered to conduct investigations of persons engaged in the operation of any adult-oriented establishment and inspect the license of the operators and establishment for compliance. Refusal of an operation or establishment to permit inspections shall be grounds for revocation, suspension or refusal to issue licenses provided by this part.

Within ten (10) days of receiving the results of the investigation conducted pursuant to § 7-51-1106(4), the board shall notify the applicant that the application is granted, denied or held for further investigation. Such additional investigation shall not exceed an additional thirty (30) days, unless otherwise agreed to by the applicant. Upon the conclusion of such additional investigation, the board shall advise the applicant in writing whether the application is granted or denied.

If an additional investigation is held and is not a result of actions by the applicant, upon the expiration of the thirtieth day from the filing of the application, the applicant shall be permitted to operate the business for which the license is sought, unless or until the board or its authorized representative notifies the applicant of a denial of the application and states the reasons for that denial.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 7; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 4.

7-51-1108. Injunctions — Contempt.

The board has the power and authority to enter into any court of the state of Tennessee having proper jurisdiction to seek an injunction against any person or adult-oriented establishment not in compliance with this part, and is further empowered to enter into any such court to enforce this part in order to ensure compliance with such provisions.

Any violation of an injunction obtained under this section is contempt with a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Each day in contempt of such injunction is considered a separate offense.

The circuit, chancery, or criminal courts of this state and the chancellors and judges of the courts shall have full power, authority, and jurisdiction, upon application by sworn detailed petition filed by the board within their respective jurisdictions, to issue any and all proper restraining orders, temporary and permanent injunctions, and any other writs and processes appropriate to carry out and enforce this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 8; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Prompt judicial review requirements, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1109. Revocation, suspension or annulment of licenses.

The board shall revoke, suspend or annul a license or permit for any of the following reasons:

Discovery that false or misleading information or data was given on any application or material facts were omitted from any application;

The operator, entertainer, employee, or any escort violates any provision of this part; provided, that an operator has a duty to supervise conduct on the premises of the adult-oriented establishment and shall be deemed responsible for the conduct of an entertainer, employee, or escort, if the operator knew, or should have known, of the violation and authorized, approved, or, in the exercise of due diligence, failed to take reasonable efforts to prevent the violation;

The operator, entertainer, employee, or escort becomes ineligible to obtain the appropriate license or permit;

Any cost or fee required to be paid by this part is not paid;

Any intoxicating liquor or malt beverage is served or consumed on the premises of the adult-oriented establishment, when an operator, employee, entertainer, or escort knew, or should have known, of the violation and authorized, approved, or, in the exercise of due diligence, failed to take reasonable efforts to prevent the violation;

An operator who, with actual or constructive knowledge, employs an employee who does not have a permit or provides space on the premises, whether by lease or otherwise, to an independent contractor who performs or works as an entertainer without a permit;

Any operator, employee or entertainer sells, furnishes, gives or displays, or causes to be sold, furnished, given or displayed to any minor any adult- oriented entertainment or adult-oriented material;

Any operator, employee or entertainer denies access of law enforcement personnel to any portion of the licensed premises wherein adult-oriented entertainment is permitted or to any portion of the licensed premises wherein adult-oriented material is displayed or sold;

An operator, who with actual or constructive knowledge, fails to maintain the licensed premises in a sanitary condition by allowing continuing violations of the published health code, rules, or regulations specifically applicable in that jurisdiction, based upon an inspection by the appropriate health authority for that jurisdiction; and

Any operator, employee or entertainer is convicted of a specified criminal act, as defined in § 7-51-1102, provided that such violation occurred on the licensed premises.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary, before revoking or suspending any license or permit, the chair shall give the license holder or permit holder not less than ten (10) nor more than twenty (20) days' written notice of the charges against such license holder or permit holder and of the revocation of such license or permit, or of the period of time such license or permit is to be suspended; such notice shall also advise the license holder or permit holder of the license holder's or permit holder's right to request a hearing before the board. In the event the license holder or permit holder does not request in writing a hearing before the board within the time set forth in such notice, the suspension or revocation shall be effective beginning the date set forth in such notice.

If the license holder or permit holder desires to request a hearing before the board to contest the suspension or revocation, such request shall be made in writing to the county mayor of such county within ten (10) days of the license holder's or permit holder's receipt of the notification from the board. If the license holder or permit holder timely requests such a hearing, the effective date of a suspension or hearing shall be stayed pending the final outcome of judicial proceedings to determine whether such license or permit has been properly revoked or suspended under the law.

If the license holder or permit holder timely requests such a hearing, a public hearing shall be held within fifteen (15) days of the county mayor's receipt of such request before the board, at which time the license holder or permit holder may present evidence contrary to this part. The board shall hear evidence concerning the basis for such suspension or revocation and shall affirm or reverse the suspension or revocation at the conclusion of such hearing; any such hearing shall be concluded no later than twenty-two (22) days after the license holder's or permit holder's receipt of the notification of the suspension or revocation, unless an extension beyond such time period is requested by the license holder or permit holder and granted by the board.

If the board affirms the suspension or revocation, the county attorney for such county shall institute suit for declaratory judgment in a court of record in such county, within five (5) days of the date of any such affirmation seeking an immediate judicial determination of whether such license or permit has been properly revoked or suspended under the law.

Any operator whose license is revoked shall not be eligible to receive a license for five (5) years from the date of revocation.

The applicant shall be entitled to judicial determination of the issues within two (2) days after joinder of issue, and a decision shall be rendered by the court within two (2) days of the conclusion of the hearing.

The board shall have the burden of showing that a revocation or suspension of a license under this section is not arbitrary or capricious. If a board decision is found by the court to be clearly erroneous, the court may overturn the decision as being arbitrary or capricious.

This subsection (c) shall apply in any county that, pursuant to § 7-51-1120, adopts this part as being applicable in its county, unless the county legislative body of that county elects to have subsection (d) apply.

In any county in which the legislative body, in accordance with subdivision (d)(3), elects to make this subsection (d) applicable in its county, if the board affirms the suspension, revocation, or annulment of the license or permit of the holder, the license or permit holder may appeal the decision to a court of record in the county, within ten (10) days of any such affirmation, by common-law writ of certiorari. The appellant shall have the burden of showing to the court that the revocation, suspension, or annulment is illegal, arbitrary or capricious. If a court finds the board decision is clearly erroneous, the court may overturn the decision as being illegal, arbitrary or capricious.

Any operator whose license is revoked shall not be eligible to receive a license for five (5) years from the date of revocation.

The legislative body of any county that, pursuant to § 7-51-1120, adopts this part as being applicable in its county, shall also have the option of electing to make this subsection (d) applicable in its county. Any action by the county may be rescinded by the legislative body, in which case subsection (c) shall apply.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 9; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2006, ch. 943, §§ 4-9; 2008, ch. 1085, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Sale, loan or exhibition of material to minors, §39-17-911.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1998 amendments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

Constitutionality of one-year license disqualification after revocation, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

Prompt judicial review requirements, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).